Tennessee, session 114, SB1492.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. The Tennessee advisory commission on intergovernmental relations
(TACIR) shall study the status of the crime stoppers programs across the state and make
recommendations to enhance such programs. The assessment must include, but not be limited
to:
(1) Assessment of the data collection and reporting capabilities of each crime
stoppers program, assessing the strengths and weaknesses of the data and reporting;
(2) Assessment of the funding streams and stability of the funding available,
while assessing the strengths and weaknesses of the crime stoppers programs to
fundraise; and
(3) Assessment of the partnership between each crime stoppers organization,
the law enforcement agencies in the community, and the community at large.
SECTION 2. TACIR shall make recommendations of methods to improve outcomes for
crime stoppers programs, including:
(1) Increased statewide coordination, accountability, and program capacity;
(2) Greater public engagement and higher tip volume;
(3) Enhanced effectiveness and cost efficiency in law enforcement efforts;
(4) Stronger trust and collaboration between communities and law enforcement;
(5) Consistent program standards and best practices across the state; and
SB1492
009612
- 1 -

(6) Establishing a statewide framework for support and accountability for crime
stoppers programs.
SECTION 3. TACIR may request information and input from other appropriate state and
local governmental entities, as necessary, and such entities shall comply with TACIR's request.
The study must be conducted from TACIR's existing resources.
SECTION 4. Upon completion of the study required by Sections 1 and 2, TACIR shall
report its findings and recommendations, including any proposed legislation, to the chair of the
judiciary committee of the senate and the chair of the committee of the house of representatives
having jurisdiction over subject matters pertaining to criminal justice, and provide a copy of the
report to the legislative librarian. The report may be delivered electronically.
SECTION 5. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
- 2 - 009612